Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.080

Prevention of child abuse and neglect—Written policy—Participation in and establishment of programs.

(1) Every school district board of directors shall develop a written policy regarding the district's role and responsibility relating to the prevention of child abuse and neglect.

(2) Every school district shall, within the resources available to it: (a) Participate in the primary prevention program established under RCW 28A.300.160; (b) develop and implement its own child abuse and neglect education and prevention program; or (c) continue with an existing local child abuse and neglect education and prevention program.

[ 1990 c 33 s 238; 1987 c 489 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.58.255.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 489: See note following RCW 28A.300.150.